Maine, session 132, LD1122.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §1611, sub-§1, ¶A-1 is enacted to read:
A-1. "Carry-out bag" means a bag provided to a customer by a retail establishment for
transporting merchandise purchased by the customer away from the retail
establishment or for packaging, protecting or otherwise containing merchandise within
the retail establishment. "Carry-out bag" includes a single-use carry-out bag, a
recycled paper carry-out bag, a reusable fabric carry-out bag and a reusable plastic
carry-out bag.
Sec. 2. 38 MRSA §1611, sub-§1, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 346, §2, is
amended to read:
B. "Point of sale" means a location where merchandise purchased by a customer is
transferred to the customer, including, but not limited to, a check‑out stand, cash
register, self-service check-out kiosk or other point of departure from a retail
establishment, including an in-store or curbside pickup location, and any other location,
including the customer's home, at which the purchased merchandise is delivered or
otherwise transferred to the customer.
Sec. 3. 38 MRSA §1611, sub-§1, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 346, §2, is
amended to read:
C. "Post-consumer recycled material fiber" means a recycled material fiber that, if not
recycled, would otherwise have been destined for solid waste disposal, having
completed its intended end use and product life cycle. "Post-consumer recycled
material fiber" does not include materials fibers and by-products generated from, and
commonly reused in, an original manufacturing and fabrication process.
Sec. 4. 38 MRSA §1611, sub-§1, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 346, §2, is
amended to read:
D. "Recycled paper carry-out bag" means a paper carry-out bag made of paper that:
(1) Is 100% recyclable; and
(2) Contains at least 20% 40% post-consumer recycled material if it has a capacity
to hold at least 8 pounds fiber, at least 40% nonwood renewable fiber or a
combination of post-consumer recycled fiber and nonwood renewable fiber that
comprises at least 40% of the fiber from which the bag is made.
Sec. 5. 38 MRSA §1611, sub-§1, ¶G, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 346, §2, is
repealed.
Sec. 6. 38 MRSA §1611, sub-§1, ¶G-1 is enacted to read:
G-1. "Reusable fabric carry-out bag" means a carry-out bag that:
(1) Has sewn or stitched handles;
(2) Is made from cloth, fabric, hemp or other fiber, whether woven or nonwoven,
and is not made from plastic;
(3) Is machine washable and machine dryable or has the capability of being
cleaned and disinfected regularly;
Page 1 - 132LR2374(01)

(4) Is specifically designed and manufactured for reuse multiple times and to
withstand a minimum of 125 repeated uses; and
(5) Has the capability of carrying a minimum weight of 18 pounds over a minimum
distance of 300 feet.
Sec. 7. 38 MRSA §1611, sub-§1, ¶G-2 is enacted to read:
G-2. "Reusable plastic carry-out bag" means a carry-out bag that:
(1) Has sewn or stitched handles;
(2) Is made wholly or partially of plastic fiber, whether woven or nonwoven, and
is not made of plastic film of any thickness;
(3) Is machine washable and machine dryable or has the capability of being
cleaned and disinfected regularly;
(4) Is specifically designed and manufactured for reuse multiple times and to
withstand a minimum of 125 repeated uses; and
(5) Has the capability of carrying a minimum weight of 18 pounds over a minimum
distance of 300 feet.
Sec. 8. 38 MRSA §1611, sub-§1, ¶H, as amended by PL 2019, c. 674, §1, is further
amended to read:
H. "Single-use carry-out bag" means a carry-out bag that is made of plastic, paper or
other material provided by a retail establishment within the retail establishment for the
purpose of transporting merchandise away from the retail establishment or for
packaging, protecting or otherwise containing merchandise within the retail
establishment specifically designed and manufactured for single use and that is not a
recycled paper carry-out bag or, a reusable fabric carry-out bag or a reusable plastic
carry-out bag.
Sec. 9. 38 MRSA §1611, sub-§2, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 346, §2, is
amended to read:
A. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, beginning April 22, 2020, a retail
establishment may not provide a single-use carry-out bag to a customer at the point of
sale or otherwise make single-use carry-out bags available to customers.
Sec. 10. 38 MRSA §1611, sub-§2, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 346, §2, is further
amended by amending subparagraph (2) to read:
(2) Bags without handles used to protect items from being damaged or from
damaging or contaminating other purchased items placed in a recycled paper carry-
out bag or, a reusable fabric carry-out bag or a reusable plastic carry-out bag;
Sec. 11. 38 MRSA §1611, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2021, c. 186, §18, is further
amended to read:
3. Recycled paper carry-out bag fees and reusable plastic carry-out bag fees;
exemptions. This subsection governs fees assessed on recycled paper carry-out bags and
on reusable plastic carry-out bags made of plastic.
Page 2 - 132LR2374(01)

A. Beginning January 15, 2021 a A retail establishment may provide a recycled paper
carry-out bag or a reusable plastic carry-out bag made of plastic to bag products at the
point of sale as long as the retail establishment charges a fee of at least 5¢ 10¢ per bag.
(1) All amounts collected pursuant to this paragraph are retained by the retail
establishment and may be used for any lawful purpose.
(2) A retail establishment may not rebate or otherwise reimburse a customer any
portion of the fee charged pursuant to this paragraph.
B. The requirement to charge a fee under paragraph A does not apply to:
(1) Stores at which less than 2% of retail sales are attributed to the sale of food
and that have less than 10,000 square feet of retail area;
(2) Restaurants; or
(3) Hunger relief organizations engaged in distributing food directly to consumers
at no charge.
A retail establishment exempt from charging a fee under this paragraph may charge a
fee for a recycled paper carry-out bag or a reusable plastic carry-out bag made of
plastic.
Sec. 12. 38 MRSA §1611, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2019, c. 617, Pt. J, §2, is
further amended to read:
5. Preemption. To ensure maximum effectiveness through uniform statewide
application, the State intends to occupy the whole field of regulation of single-use carry-
out bags at retail establishments beginning March 17, 2020. A local government may not
adopt an ordinance regulating single-use carry-out bags at retail establishments, and,
beginning January 15, 2021, any ordinance or regulation that violates this subsection is
void and has no force or effect.
Sec. 13. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026.